West Virginia, session 2026, SB290.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of revenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. Insurance Commission. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §33-2-10 of this code, relating to the Insurance Commission (mass marketing of property and liability insurance, 114 CSR 09), is authorized.